Alaska, session 34, HB249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 28.10 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 28.10.285. Transfer to insurance company. (a) When the owner of a 05 registered vehicle transfers or assigns the owner's title or interest to an insurance 06 company after payment of damages, the supporting documents used to transfer 07 ownership need not be notarized and may be signed electronically and printed. In this 08 subsection, "supporting document" includes a power of attorney, duplicate title, and 09 odometer disclosure forms. 10 (b) The insurance company shall indemnify and hold harmless the department 11 for any claims resulting from issuing a title under this section. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.